Utah statutes.
9-8-603.   Standards -- Publication.
(1)  The writing and publishing of each history shall meet good
historiographical and other professional standards as prescribed and approved
by the division.  The history shall be identified as the Centennial History of
the County.
(2)  After approval by the division, each county history may bear, with the
approval of the Utah State Centennial Commission, the state centennial history
logo and shall be compiled, published, and offered to the public before
December 31, 1996, as part of the county's and state's centennial celebrations
at a cost not to exceed the cost of printing and binding.  The proceeds of the
sales shall be returned to the county.
